Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1044.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 45 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER FCONNECTED VEHICLE SERVICE ANDREMOTE ACCESS AND TRACKINGSec.4591. Definitions.4592. Connected vehicle service.4593. Unauthorized use of electronic tracking device.§ 4591. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:123456789101112131415161718 "Abuse survivor." A person who has been issued a protection order under any of the following:(1) 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to protection from abuse).(2) 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 67 (relating to domestic and sexual violence victim address confidentiality).(3) 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 62A (relating to protection of victims of sexual violence or intimidation)."Account holder." A person who is a party to or a user of services provided under a contract for connected vehicle service with a covered provider and includes a subscriber, customer or registered user."Connected vehicle location access." A type of connected vehicle service that allows a person who is outside of a vehicle, excluding a covered provider or vehicle cellular data provider, to view or track the location of the vehicle, including a location determined by a global positioning system or a global positioning device, whether through the Internet, an application-based technology or any other remote wireless connectivity technology."Connected vehicle service." A capability provided by or on behalf of a vehicle manufacturer that enables a person, excluding a covered provider or vehicle cellular data provider, to remotely obtain data from, or send commands to, a vehicle, which may be accomplished through a software application that is designed to be operated on a mobile device."Connected vehicle service account." An account or other means by which a person enrolls in or obtains access to connected vehicle service."Connected vehicle service request." A request by a driver 20250SB1044PN1254 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to terminate a person's access to connected vehicle service."Covered provider." A vehicle manufacturer or an entity acting on behalf of the vehicle manufacturer that provides connected vehicle service."Electronic tracking device." An electronic or mechanical device that permits an individual to remotely determine or track the position and movement of another individual or the vehicle of another individual."Fleet vehicle." One or more motor vehicles:(1) owned, leased or contracted for business or government purposes for any of the following:(i) An entity.(ii) An employee of the entity.(iii) An agent of the entity.(iv) An individual authorized to operate the fleet vehicle in compliance with a contract between the entity and another party;(2) held for lease or rental to the general public; or(3) held for sale by a motor vehicle dealer.§ 4592. Connected vehicle service.(a) Connected vehicle service.--A vehicle with connected vehicle service shall clearly indicate to a person who is inside a vehicle when a person who is outside the vehicle has accessed either of the following:(1) Connected vehicle service.(2) Connected vehicle location access.(b) Access to connected vehicle service.--A covered provider shall:(1) Provide a process that includes a prominent and clearly visible link entitled "HOW TO DISCONNECT REMOTE 20250SB1044PN1254 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 VEHICLE ACCESS" on the covered provider's publicly accessible Internet website to complete both of the following transactions:(i) Submit a connected vehicle service request.(ii) Obtain a new connected vehicle service account.(2) Ensure that all communications under this subchapter are clear, concise and written in accessible language so that drivers, including abuse survivors, receive support and clear guidance throughout the process for submitting a connected vehicle service request or obtaining a new connected vehicle service account.(c) Processing of requests.--To enhance transparency and communication, the process to submit a connected vehicle service request or obtain a new connected vehicle service account shall be efficient, secure, user-friendly and include all of the following features:(1) Upon submission of a connected vehicle service request or request to obtain a new connected vehicle service account, the covered provider shall automatically send a confirmation email to the driver acknowledging the receipt of the request. The email shall contain a reference number for the request and an outline of the subsequent steps in the process.(2) Upon completing the review of the request, the covered provider shall inform the driver of the action taken, including, as applicable, whether a person's access to connected vehicle service has been terminated or if additional information or proof of legal possession of the vehicle is needed. The alert shall clearly state any relevant details or further actions required from the driver to 20250SB1044PN1254 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 complete a successful connected vehicle service request.(3) If a connected vehicle service request is approved, the covered provider shall provide the driver with a clear explanation and guidance on how to create a driver's own connected vehicle service account, if applicable, to ensure that the driver can maintain control over the connected vehicle service once another person's access to connected vehicle service has been terminated.(d) Legal authority to terminate access to connected vehicle service.--Termination of access shall be in accordance with the following:(1) A driver shall demonstrate to a covered provider the authority to terminate a person's access to connected vehicle service by providing both of the following:(i) The vehicle identification number.(ii) Proof of legal possession of the vehicle, which may be a legal title to the vehicle or a dissolution decree, temporary court order or domestic violence restraining order that awards possession or exclusive use of the vehicle to the driver. A court order awarding sole possession or exclusive use of a vehicle shall take priority over a vehicle title showing joint ownership for purposes of this subchapter.(2) A covered provider shall not require a driver to provide any proof of legal possession other than what is required in paragraph (1) to establish the authority to terminate a person's access to connected vehicle service.(3) A covered provider shall not require a driver to take any action to terminate a person's access to connected vehicle service other than what is set forth in this 20250SB1044PN1254 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection, including requiring any of the following:(i) Payment of a fee, penalty or other charge to complete a connected vehicle service request.(ii) Maintaining or extending the term of a connected vehicle service account.(iii) Approval by any account holder, including the named account holder, of the change in access.(iv) An increase in the rate charged for the connected vehicle service.(4) A covered provider shall terminate a person's access to connected vehicle service within two business days after the date of receiving a completed request from a driver who meets the requirements of this section.(e) Termination of connected vehicle service.--(1) The covered provider:(i) If a covered provider terminated a person's access to connected vehicle service in response to a connected vehicle service request, shall not provide to the person any data or information regarding the driver, the vehicle or any new connected vehicle service account that was generated after that person's access to the connected vehicle service was terminated.(ii) Shall ensure that all personal information provided during the process to terminate a person's access to connected vehicle service is handled with appropriate security and privacy, adhering to relevant data protection laws and regulations.(iii) Along with an officer, director, employee, vendor or agent of the covered provider, shall treat any information submitted by a driver under this subchapter 20250SB1044PN1254 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 as confidential and shall comply with applicable privacy laws.(iv) Shall not share information submitted by a driver under this subchapter with any third party without the affirmative consent of the driver, unless sharing that information is required to effectuate a connected vehicle service request.(2) Nothing in this section shall preclude a covered provider from responding to a court order or warrant.(3) The termination under this subchapter shall not be deemed to impact legal ownership of a vehicle.(f) Disabling connected vehicle location access.--(1) If a vehicle includes connected vehicle location access, a covered provider shall provide a mechanism that can be used by a driver who is inside a vehicle to immediately disable connected vehicle location access. A mechanism for disabling connected vehicle location access shall meet all of the following requirements:(i) Be prominently located and easy to use.(ii) Not require access to, or use of, a remote or online application.(iii) Not require account creation, a password or login information.(iv) Allow connected vehicle location access that has been disabled from inside the vehicle to be enabled only by a driver who is located inside the vehicle.(2) A vehicle manufacturer may require a driver to input a mobile phone number associated with the connected vehicle service account. If a vehicle manufacturer requires a driver to input a mobile phone number in order to disable the 20250SB1044PN1254 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 connected vehicle location access connection, the manufacturer shall not require any further information in order to allow the driver to disable the connection, including using that number as part of a two-factor authentication process that results in sending a code to the mobile phone number.(3) Disabling the connected vehicle location access from inside the vehicle shall not result in an account holder of the connected vehicle service, vehicle manufacturer or a third-party service provider receiving a notification related to the connected vehicle location access being disabled, including an alert, email, text message or telephone call.(g) Liability.--A covered provider or an officer, director, employee, vendor or agent of a covered provider shall not be subject to liability for any claims deriving from an action taken in compliance with this subchapter.(h) Exclusions.--This section does not apply to vehicles owned or operated by a rental company.§ 4593. Unauthorized use of electronic tracking device.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits the offense of unauthorized use of an electronic tracking device if the person installs or places an electronic tracking device without consent, or causes an electronic tracking device to be installed or placed on or in the vehicle of another person without consent, and uses the electronic tracking device to track the location of the other person or the other person's vehicle within this Commonwealth.(b) Exceptions.--This section shall not apply to the installation, placement or use of an electronic tracking device:(1) By an investigative officer, law enforcement officer 20250SB1044PN1254 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or agency, while conducting an investigation, if the officer or agency is engaged in the lawful performance of official duties and in accordance with other Federal and State laws.(2) Under a court order or as part of supervision for a pretrial diversionary program, probation or parole.(3) Unless prohibited by court order, by the parent or legal guardian of a minor when tracking the minor or by a person authorized by the parent or legal guardian to serve as a caretaker of the minor at any time when the minor is under the caretaker's sole care, if:(i) the parents or legal guardians are lawfully married to each other and not separated or otherwise living apart;(ii) the parent or legal guardian is the sole surviving parent or legal guardian of the minor;(iii) the parent or legal guardian has primary physical custody of the minor while the electronic tracking device is installed and monitored; or(iv) the parents or legal guardians are divorced, separated or otherwise living apart and both consent to the installation of and monitoring by the electronic tracking device.(4) By a legal authorized guardian of an incapacitated person as defined in 20 Pa.C.S. § 5902 (relating to definitions) or by a caregiver or family member of a senior citizen or an adult with a disability, if a physician of the senior citizen or adult with a disability recommends the installation of an electronic tracking device or tracking application to ensure the safety of the senior citizen or adult with a disability.20250SB1044PN1254 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) By the owner, lessee or contractor of a fleet vehicle who installs or directs the installation of the electronic tracking device on the vehicle during the period of ownership, lease or contract if:(i) the electronic tracking device is removed before the vehicle's title is transferred or the vehicle's lease expires;(ii) the new owner of the vehicle, in the case of a sale; the lessor of the vehicle, in the case of an expired lease; or the contractor, in the case of an expired contractual arrangement, consents in writing to the nonremoval of the electronic tracking device; or(iii) the owner of the vehicle at the time of the installation of the electronic traffic device was the original manufacturer of the vehicle.(6) By an electronic communications provider to the extent that the installation, placement or use is disclosed in the provider's terms of use, privacy policy or similar document and accepted by the customer.(7) By a person acting in good faith or on behalf of a business entity for a legitimate business interest.(c) Venue for unauthorized location tracking offense.--An offense committed under subsection (a) may be deemed to have been committed where:(1) the information was received;(2) the victim resides; or(3) the property is located.(d) Grading for unauthorized location tracking offense.--(1) A first offense under this section constitutes a misdemeanor of the second degree.20250SB1044PN1254 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A second or subsequent offense under this section constitutes a misdemeanor of the first degree.Section 2. The addition of 75 Pa.C.S. § 4592(b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g) and (h) shall apply to vehicles that have connected vehicle service.Section 3. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The addition of 75 Pa.C.S. § 4592(a) shall take effect January 1, 2028.(2) The addition of 75 Pa.C.S. § 4592(b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g) and (h) shall take effect July 1, 2025.(3) This section shall take effect immediately.(4) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1044PN1254 - 11 - 12345678910111213